Hawaii statutes.
§346-396
Voluntary care agreement. If a young adult is no longer under jurisdiction
pursuant to chapter 587A as the subject child and chooses to participate in the
young adult voluntary foster care program and meets the eligibility criteria
set forth in section 346-395, the department and the young adult shall enter
into a voluntary care agreement that shall include, at a minimum, the
following:

(1) The obligation for the young adult to continue to
meet the conditions for eligibility described in section 346-395 and the
program requirements for the duration of the voluntary care agreement;

(2) The young adult's right to terminate the
voluntary care agreement at any time; and

(3) The voluntary nature of the young adult's
participation in the young adult voluntary foster care program. [L 2013, c 252,
pt of §2; am L 2016, c 134, §4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next